Maryland, session 2026, HB0525.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–137.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ACADEMIC SCHOOL DAY” MEANS ANY STRUCTURED OR
UNSTRUCTURED LEARNING EXPERIENCE THAT OCCURS FROM WHEN THE FIRST
BELL RINGS AT THE START OF THE SCHOOL DAY UNTIL THE DISMISSAL BELL RINGS
AT THE END OF THE SCHOOL DAY, INCLUDING INSTRUCTIONAL PERIODS, LUNCH,
RECESS, PASSING PERIODS, AND TRANSITIONAL PERIODS.
(3) (I) “ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION DEVICE” MEANS ANY
PORTABLE ELECTRONIC DEVICE CARRIED OR TRANSPORTED BY A STUDENT TO
RECEIVE, SEND, OR RECORD VOICE, IMAGE, OR TEXT CONTENT, INCLUDING CELL
PHONES, TABLETS, LAPTOPS, SMART WATCHES, WIRELESS EARBUDS OR
HEADPHONES, GEOLOCATION DEVICES, AND ANY OTHER DEVICE WITH
COMMUNICATION FUNCTIONS.
(II) “ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION DEVICE” DOES NOT
INCLUDE AN ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION DEVICE PROVIDED BY A COUNTY BOARD
FOR INSTRUCTIONAL PURPOSES.
(4) “SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM” MEANS AN INTERNET–BASED
APPLICATION, WEBSITE, OR DIGITAL SERVICE THAT ENABLES USERS TO CREATE,
SHARE, OR VIEW CONTENT OR TO INTERACT WITH OTHER USERS THROUGH
PROFILES, ACCOUNTS, FEEDS, MESSAGING, COMMENTS, REACTIONS, OR SIMILAR
SOCIAL FEATURES, AND THAT IS PRIMARILY DESIGNED TO FACILITATE SOCIAL
INTERACTION, USER–GENERATED CONTENT, OR CONTENT DISTRIBUTION TO A
BROAD OR SEMI–PUBLIC AUDIENCE.
(4) (5) “STORE” MEANS TO SECURE IN A MANNER DETERMINED BY
THE COUNTY BOARD TO ENSURE THE ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION DEVICE IS NOT
CARRIED ON THE STUDENT’S PERSON DURING THE ACADEMIC SCHOOL DAY.

HOUSE BILL 525 3
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE
BLIND OR THE MARYLAND SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF.
(B) (C) NOT LATER THAN THE 2027–2028 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH COUNTY
BOARD SHALL DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A POLICY TO LIMIT PROHIBIT THE USE OF
ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION DEVICES BY STUDENTS DURING THE ACADEMIC
SCHOOL DAY.
(C) (D) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (D) (E) OF THIS SECTION,
THE POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL:
(1) PROHIBIT A STUDENT FROM USING AN ELECTRONIC
COMMUNICATION DEVICE DURING THE ACADEMIC SCHOOL DAY;
(2) REQUIRE A STUDENT TO STORE THE STUDENT’S ELECTRONIC
COMMUNICATION DEVICE DURING THE ACADEMIC SCHOOL DAY;
(3) PROHIBIT A STUDENT FROM USING THE SOCIAL MEDIA
APPLICATIONS AND SOCIAL MEDIA WEBSITES DETERMINED BY THE COUNTY BOARD
ACCESSING OR USING A SOCIAL MEDIA PLATFORM DURING THE ACADEMIC SCHOOL
DAY; AND
(4) REQUIRE ADMINISTRATOR APPROVAL FOR THE USE OF A
PERSONAL ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION DEVICE FOR EDUCATIONAL PURPOSES
WHEN A SCHOOL–ISSUED ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION DEVICE IS UNAVAILABLE.
(D) (E) THE POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT
PROHIBIT A STUDENT FROM USING AN ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION DEVICE:
(1) FOR A STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY, FOR REASONABLE
ACCOMMODATIONS RELATED TO A DISABILITY, INCLUDING FOR ANY PURPOSE
DOCUMENTED IN THE STUDENT’S INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM OR 504
PLAN;
(2) TO MONITOR OR ADDRESS A STUDENT’S DOCUMENTED HEALTH
ISSUE;
(3) DURING AN EMERGENCY EVENT, IF EXPRESSLY AUTHORIZED BY
AN ADMINISTRATOR;
(4) (3) WHEN DIRECTED BY AN ADMINISTRATOR FOR
EDUCATIONAL PURPOSES INSTRUCTOR TO BE USED AS PART OF A LESSON;

HOUSE BILL 525
(5) (4) (3) TO ACCESS LANGUAGE TRANSLATION TOOLS TO ENSURE
EDUCATIONAL EQUITY FOR MULTILINGUAL STUDENTS WHEN SCHOOL–ISSUED
ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION DEVICES ARE NOT AVAILABLE OR SUFFICIENT FOR
THIS PURPOSE; OR
(6) (5) (4) FOR THE PURPOSE OF MEETING CAREGIVING
RESPONSIBILITIES, AS APPROVED BY A PRINCIPAL.
(E) (F) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL:
(1) ENGAGE PARENTS, STUDENTS, EDUCATORS, AND COMMUNITY
STAKEHOLDERS IN THE DEVELOPMENT AND REVISION OF THE POLICY, INCLUDING
DETERMINING ENFORCEMENT OF THE POLICY; AND
(2) PUBLISH AND MAKE THE POLICY AVAILABLE IN MULTIPLE
LANGUAGES IN STUDENT HANDBOOKS, ON THE SCHOOL’S AND COUNTY BOARD’S
WEBSITES, AND AT SCHOOL EVENTS.
(F) (G) (1) A POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL
INCLUDE APPROPRIATE DISCIPLINARY MEASURES FOR VIOLATIONS OF THE POLICY.
(2) THE DISCIPLINARY MEASURES ADOPTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE TIERED DISCIPLINARY MEASURES ENFORCED BY AN
ADMINISTRATOR.
(3) A DISCIPLINARY MEASURE ADOPTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT INCLUDE SUSPENSION OR EXPULSION SOLELY FOR A
VIOLATION OF THE POLICY.
(G) (H) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2027, AND EACH SEPTEMBER 1
UNTIL SEPTEMBER 1, 2032, EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE
DEPARTMENT ON THE IMPACTS OF THE IMPLEMENTATION A COPY OF THE
ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION DEVICE POLICY IN THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM
IMPLEMENTED UNDER THIS SECTION, INCLUDING:
(1) A COPY OF THE CURRENT ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION DEVICE
POLICY THAT DESCRIBES: DESCRIPTION OF THE POLICY’S:
(I) STORAGE AND SECURITY REQUIREMENTS AND ANY
RELATED GRADE–LEVEL DIFFERENTIATIONS ESTABLISHED IN THE POLICY;

HOUSE BILL 525 5
(II) GRADE–LEVEL DIFFERENTIATION DISCIPLINE MEASURES
AND ANY RELATED GRADE–LEVEL DIFFERENTIATIONS ESTABLISHED IN THE
POLICY;
(III) INSTRUCTIONAL USE PROTOCOLS; AND
(IV) EMERGENCY COMMUNICATION PLANS; AND
(2) DOCUMENTATION OF STAKEHOLDER ENGAGEMENT; IN THE
DEVELOPMENT OF THE POLICY.
(3) COMPLIANCE AND ENFORCEMENT DATA, INCLUDING:
(I) RELATED DISCIPLINARY REFERRALS, DISAGGREGATED BY
STUDENT DEMOGRAPHIC SUBGROUPS; AND
(II) THE USE OF RESTORATIVE PRACTICES AS A DISCIPLINARY
MEASURE, IF USED;
(4) DESCRIPTION OF THE IMPACTS ON THE SCHOOL ENVIRONMENT,
IF ANY, INCLUDING SURVEY DATA FROM STUDENTS, TEACHERS, AND PARENTS ON
FOCUS, WELL–BEING, AND SATISFACTION FOLLOWING POLICY IMPLEMENTATION;
(5) EQUITY AND ACCOMMODATION DATA, INCLUDING THE NUMBER
AND TYPE OF EXEMPTIONS TO THE POLICY GRANTED BY A SCHOOL; AND
(6) ANTICIPATED POLICY REVISIONS FOR THE UPCOMING SCHOOL
YEAR, IF ANY.
(H) (I) ON OR BEFORE JULY DECEMBER 1, 2028, AND EACH JULY 1
UNTIL JULY 1, 2033, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH ON THE DEPARTMENT’S
WEBSITE A REPORT THAT COMPILES AND SUMMARIZES THE REPORTS OF THE
COUNTY BOARDS ON THE IMPACTS OF IMPLEMENTING THE ELECTRONIC
COMMUNICATION DEVICE POLICIES OF EACH COUNTY BOARD SUBMITTED TO THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (G) (H) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING:
(1) THE DATA SUBMITTED BY THE COUNTY BOARDS TO THE
DEPARTMENT;
(2) ENFORCEMENT CHALLENGES; AND
(3) TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AND MODEL POLICIES.

HOUSE BILL 525
(I) (J) (1) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL SEND TO THE DEPARTMENT
AN UPDATED COPY OF THE ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION DEVICE POLICY
DEVELOPED AND IMPLEMENTED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE A COPY OF
EACH COUNTY BOARD’S ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION DEVICE POLICY SUBMITTED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(J) (K) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 30, 2028, AND EACH JULY 30 UNTIL
JULY 30, 2033, EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE
DEPARTMENT ON THE IMPACTS OF THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE ELECTRONIC
COMMUNICATION DEVICE POLICY, INCLUDING:
(I) COMPLIANCE AND ENFORCEMENT DATA, INCLUDING
RELATED DISCIPLINARY REFERRALS DISAGGREGATED BY STUDENT DEMOGRAPHIC
SUBGROUPS; AND
(II) EQUITY AND ACCOMMODATION DATA, INCLUDING THE
NUMBER AND TYPES OF EXEMPTIONS TO THE POLICY GRANTED BY SCHOOLS IN THE
COUNTY.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEMS, SHALL DETERMINE THE BEST METHOD TO SUBMIT THE INFORMATION
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO THE DEPARTMENT,
INCLUDING WITHIN EXISTING REPORTING REQUIREMENTS.
(K) (L) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT
THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.